Utah statutes.
67-5-21.   Internet Crimes Against Children (ICAC) unit creation -- Duties -- Employment of staff.

(1)  There is created within the Office of the Attorney General the Internet Crimes Against Children (ICAC) unit to investigate and prosecute cases involving child pornography and cases involving enticing minors over the Internet into illegal sexual acts.

(2)  The attorney general may employ investigators, prosecutors, and necessary support staff for the unit created under Subsection (1).

